South Dakota, session 2026, SB17.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 12-27-21 be AMENDED:
12-27-21. A candidate or political committee may not accept any contribution or
loan from:
(1) A state;
(2) A state agency;
(3) A political subdivision of a state;
(4) A foreign government;
(5) A foreign national, as defined in 52 U.S.C. § 30121(b) (January 1, 2026);
(6) A federal agency; or
(7) The federal government.
A violation of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor. A subsequent offense within
a calendar year is a Class 6 felony.
Section 2. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in full force
and effect from and after its passage and approval.

26.496.14 2 17
An Act to prohibit a candidate or political committee from accepting contributions or loans
made by a foreign national, to provide a penalty therefor, and to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 17
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 17 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB17 ENROLLED